Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Operation and Powers
7-53-305. Exemption from taxation — Payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes — Securities.

The corporation is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the municipality with respect to which the corporation is organized and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the corporation and all properties at any time owned by it, and the income and revenues from the properties, and all bonds issued by it, and the income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all taxation in the state of Tennessee. Also for purposes of the Securities Act of 1980, compiled as title 48, chapter 1, part 1, bonds issued by the corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state of Tennessee.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, and unless the municipality adopts an ordinance or resolution requiring that any agreement with respect to the payments in lieu of taxes entered into pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) be approved by the municipality, a corporation may negotiate and receive from any lessee of the corporation, without any delegation from the municipality, payments in lieu of taxes with respect to a tax-credit housing project; provided, that:

The payments in lieu of taxes are payable to all applicable taxing jurisdictions in which the project is located and are not less than the taxes that would have been paid to each such taxing jurisdiction for the tax year prior to the year the project became a tax-credit housing project; and

The chief executive officer of the municipality has executed a letter supporting the project that is filed with the corporation.

The corporation is declared to be serving a public purpose by negotiating and receiving from any lessee of the corporation payments in lieu of taxes with respect to a tax-credit housing project.

As used in this subdivision (a)(2), “tax-credit housing project” or “project” means a project that has received an allocation of low-income housing tax credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 42), or any successor provision, from the Tennessee housing development agency or is otherwise eligible for the tax credits as the result of the issuance of bonds, the interest on which is not subject to federal income taxation.

The corporation may acquire and lease a tax-credit housing project as authorized in this chapter, notwithstanding any limitations in this chapter on the power of the corporation to purchase or otherwise acquire apartments.

The corporation has the authority to negotiate, accept, or waive from any of the corporation's lessees payments in lieu of taxes only upon receipt of a formal delegation of such authority from the municipality or municipalities that formed the corporation. Any such authorization shall be granted only upon a finding by the municipality or municipalities that the payments or waiver of the payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the corporation's public purposes. The legislative body of the municipality or municipalities making the delegation may require the corporation to submit for approval any agreement with any of the corporation's lessees providing for the acceptance or waiver of payments in lieu of taxes.

No agreement providing for the acceptance or waiver of payments in lieu of taxes, including any renewal or extension of such agreement, entered into by a municipality or corporation to which such authority has been delegated shall result in a corporation's lessee making payments in lieu of taxes in an amount less than the applicable ad valorem taxes for a period that is greater than twenty (20) years plus a reasonable construction or installation period not to exceed three (3) years, unless both the commissioner of economic and community development and the comptroller of the treasury have made a written determination that the agreement is in the best interest of the state.

The corporation shall attach to each agreement an analysis of the costs and benefits of the agreement, in such manner and under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the commissioner of economic and community development or the commissioner's designee.

With regard to any project located within an area designated as the center-city area by a municipality in which there has been created a central business improvement district pursuant to the Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971, compiled in chapter 84 of this title, the amount of such payments shall not be fixed below the lesser of:

Ad valorem taxes otherwise due and payable by a tax-paying entity upon the current fair market value of the leased properties; or

Ad valorem taxes that were or would have been due and payable on the leased properties for the period immediately preceding the date of their acquisition by the corporation.

The minimum payments in subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) shall not be applicable to an eligible headquarters facility.

This section shall apply, from the date of their issuance, to all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued under this chapter and the income from such bonds whether heretofore or hereafter received.

Payments in lieu of taxes and any lease payments payable to a corporation, to the extent such payments in lieu of taxes and lease payments in the aggregate do not exceed ad valorem taxes otherwise due and payable where the leased property is owned by an entity subject to taxation, shall become and remain a first lien upon the fee interest in the leased property from January 1 of the year in which such payment in lieu of taxes on lease payments is due. The corporation may enforce such lien, and also obtain interest at ten percent (10%) per annum from the date due and reasonable attorneys' fees, by suit filed in the circuit or chancery court.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall apply with equal force to all such subleases and their sublessees.

To the extent lease payments or payments in lieu of taxes exceed the amount necessary to defray debt service on project bonds or other financing, any payments not timely made as agreed may be collected by or on behalf of the city or county in the same manner as delinquent property taxes.

On or before October 1 of each year, the corporation lessee shall submit to the comptroller of the treasury an annual report containing:

A list of all the real and personal property owned by the corporation and its associated entities and subsidiaries;

The value of each listed property as estimated by the lessee;

The date and term of the lease for each listed property;

The amount of payments made in lieu of property taxes for each listed property;

The date each listed property is scheduled to return to the regular tax rolls;

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

The property address and parcel identification number of the property assigned by the assessor of property;

The amount of rents paid;

The amount of any property taxes paid on the leasehold assessment under § 67-5-502(d);

Any changes in the name since the last filing;

How the payments in lieu of taxes are allocated between the city and county according to the economic development agreement; and

Identification of project type according to definitions provided in this chapter.

A copy of the filing made pursuant to subdivision (e)(1) shall be filed with the assessor of property in the county where the property is located on or before October 15 of the year in which the filing is made with the comptroller of the treasury. The assessor of property may audit or review, or both, the data report on all payment in lieu of tax agreements and conduct comparative analysis to ensure that all agreements are reported to the assessor of property.

Each lessee of the corporation shall be responsible for the timely completion and filing of the report. Failure to timely complete and file the report shall subject the lessee to a late filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable to the comptroller of the treasury. In addition, any lessee failing to file the report with the comptroller of the treasury or the assessor within thirty (30) days after written demand for the report, shall owe an additional payment in lieu of tax in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500). This payment shall be collectable by the trustee for the benefit of the county, in the same manner as property taxes, on certification from the comptroller of the treasury or the assessor.

The corporation to which authority has been delegated to create pilot leaseholds and payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes shall prepare biannual reports detailing the lessee's compliance with the terms and conditions of the pilot lease agreement or any other agreement whereby ad valorem taxes are substituted in favor of a payment in lieu of taxes. Such report shall detail the lessee's compliance and noncompliance where applicable, and its fiscal impact on revenues generated from ad valorem taxes in each municipality affected by such payment in lieu of taxes. This subsection (f) shall apply only to counties with populations of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and to municipalities within such counties.

An industrial development corporation may not negotiate any payment in lieu of tax agreement for less than the county ad valorem taxes otherwise due unless:

The corporation is a joint corporation organized by the county and one or more of the municipalities in the county;

The corporation has entered into an interlocal agreement with the county in regard to payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes; or

The corporation has received written approval from the county mayor and the legislative body of the county regarding payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

Subdivision (g)(1) shall apply to any county having a population of not less than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand four hundred (897,400) nor more than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred (897,500) and at least five (5) industrial development corporations formed under title 7, chapter 53, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, an industrial development corporation organized solely by a municipality that does not impose a real property tax may only enter into a payment in lieu of ad valorem tax agreement or lease if:

The county in which the municipality is located has approved the entering into a payment in lieu of ad valorem tax agreement or lease with respect to the property at issue; or

Either the industrial development corporation or the municipality which organized the industrial development corporation agrees to pay to the county in which the municipality is located an amount equal to the amount of real property tax that would have been assessed to the property at issue for each year in which the payment in lieu of ad valorem tax agreement or lease is effective were the property not owned by the industrial development corporation during such time period.

An industrial development corporation may negotiate a payment in lieu of tax agreement for less than the ad valorem taxes otherwise due for a retail business for a period longer than ten (10) years, plus a reasonable construction or installation period not to exceed three (3) years, if:

The corporation is a joint industrial development corporation with representation of all affected taxing jurisdictions within the county;

The corporation has entered into an interlocal agreement with other taxing jurisdictions to establish criteria for any payment in lieu of tax agreements that might affect shared tax bases;

The corporation has received written approval from each affected local governmental entity. As used in this subdivision (i)(1)(C), “affected local governmental entity” means a county or local special school district which will suffer an actual loss of tax revenue under a payment in lieu of tax agreement; or

The corporation pays the other affected local governments the amount of ad valorem taxes those governments would otherwise receive for the affected property based on its assessed value after the initial ten (10) years of the agreement.

The requirements under this subsection (i) shall not apply to payment in lieu of tax agreements affecting only the municipality that created the corporation and the beneficiary making the agreement.

This subsection (i) does not apply in any county having a population of not less than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census.

Before an industrial development corporation approves a payment in lieu of tax agreement, the corporation shall hold a public meeting relating to the proposed agreement after notice is provided by the corporation or governing body, as may be required by law, at least five (5) days prior to the date of such public meeting. Such notice must include the time, place, and purpose of the public meeting.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 11; 1959, ch. 222, § 4; 1969, ch. 55, § 3; 1969, ch. 244, § 1; 1971, ch. 304, §§ 3, 4; 1976, ch. 515, § 6; 1978, ch. 739, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-2811; Acts 1986, ch. 724, § 1; 1997, ch. 243, § 1; 1997, ch. 398, § 1; 1998, ch. 828, §§ 4-6; 2000, ch. 914, § 1; 2000, ch. 961, § 1; 2001, ch. 339, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 605, § 1; 2002, ch. 712, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 405, § 1; 2004, ch. 813, § 1; 2007, ch. 449, § 1; 2008, ch. 694, § 2; 2008, ch. 1013, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 302, § 1; 2015, ch. 519, § 2; 2016, ch. 588, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 777, §§ 1-4; 2018, ch. 1064, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 914, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to reports due for tax year 2000.

Acts 2001, ch. 339, § 3, provided that nothing in the amendments by that act to this section shall apply to any agreement finalized prior to January 1, 2002.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2003, ch. 405, § 2, provided that any provision of that act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then all provisions and applications of that act are declared to be invalid and void.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(2).

The 2016 amendment by ch. 588, substituted “comptroller of the treasury” for “state board of equalization” in (e)(1) following “submit to the”; at the end of the first sentence of (e)(2); and at the end of the first sentence of (e)(3); and substituted “comptroller of the treasury” for “board” preceding “or the assessor” in the second sentence of (e)(3) and at the end of the last sentence of (e)(3). The 2016 amendment by ch. 777, in (b), redesignated the former last sentence of (1) as (2) and rewrote the remainder of (1) which read: “The municipality has the power to delegate to the corporation the authority to negotiate and accept from the corporation's lessees, payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes; provided, that any such authorization shall be granted only upon a finding that such payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the corporation's public purposes as defined in this section; provided, further, that no contract, lease, understanding, or other agreement of any kind, including any renewal or extension of the agreement, entered into by a municipality or corporation to which such authority has been delegated shall permit payment in lieu of taxes to be waived or otherwise not assessed for a period of greater than twenty (20) years from the date of such contract, lease, understanding or other agreement, unless both the commissioner of economic and community development and the comptroller of the treasury have made a written determination that such agreement is in the best interest of the state. The corporation shall attach to each agreement an analysis of the costs and benefits of the agreement, in such manner and under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the commissioner of economic and community development or the commissioner's designee. The legislative body of the municipality making such delegation may, in its sole discretion, require the corporation to submit any such agreement to such legislative body for its approval.”, inserted “the Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971, compiled in” in the present introductory language of (2), redesignated former (2) as present (3), and substituted “in subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B)” for “in subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B)” in present (3); and, in (e)(1), deleted former (F) which read: “(F) A calculation of the taxes that would have been due for each listed property if the properties were privately owned or otherwise subject to taxation;”, deleted “to the governing body” from the end of (H), and inserted “between the city and county” in (K).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2018, added (i) and (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 519, § 3. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 588, § 7. March 10, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 777, § 6. April 12, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1064, § 3. October 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Credit against excise tax on corporate earnings, §67-4-2009.

Sales tax and use tax, title 67, ch. 6.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Industrial development corporation's use of payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes, OAG 96-083, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 93 (6/5/96).

Authority of industrial development corporations to extend existing lease terms but with continuing payment obligation in lieu of taxes, OAG 97-049, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (4/15/97).

Constitutionality of exemption from taxation, OAG 98-0110, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (6/11/98).

A proposed amendment to T.C.A. §7-53-305, which would allow an industrial development board in a certain county to agree with a lessee to accept in lieu of tax payments that are less than the taxes that would be payable if the property were owned by a private owner, but only if certain conditions are met, was constitutionally suspect in the absence of a rational basis for the different treatment of an industrial development board's power to negotiate in lieu of tax payments in a single county, OAG 02-044, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (4/9/02).

The caption of Acts 2003, ch. 405, amending T.C.A. §7-53-305(g), does not violate Tenn. Const., art. II, § 17, OAG 03-123, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (9/25/03).

Absent a rational basis for the different treatment of an industrial development board's power to negotiate in lieu of tax payments in counties within two narrow population brackets, Acts 2003, ch. 405, amending T.C.A. §7-53-305(g), is constitutionally suspect under Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 8, OAG 03-123, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (9/25/03).

Under T.C.A. §7-53-305(g), if a municipal industrial development corporation negotiates payments in lieu of taxes in an amount equal to or exceeding the county ad valorem taxes otherwise due, it may do so without involvement or approval of the county, OAG 04-040, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (3/12/04).

7-53-306. Municipal liability — Submission to voters — Remedies of bondholders.

The municipality shall not, in any event, be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the corporation, or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever that may be undertaken by the corporation, and none of the bonds of the corporation or any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever. The municipality may pledge its full faith and credit as surety to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds in the following manner:

The governing body of the municipality may by resolution propose the pledging of the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality as surety to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. After securing a certificate of public purpose and necessity as provided in § 7-53-307, the governing body may direct the county election commission to hold an election for the registered voters of the municipality to determine whether the full faith and credit of the municipality shall be so pledged. Should three fourths (¾) of the voters cast their vote in favor of lending the municipality's credit by pledging the full faith and credit of the municipality to the payment, as surety, of the principal and interest of such bonds, according to the certificate of the county election commission, the municipality, through its governing board, would be authorized to so pledge its full faith and credit as surety and so indicate by the signature of the mayor or other chief executive official of the municipality on the bonds; and

In the event such pledge of full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality is given, any holder or holders of the bonds, including a trustee or trustees for holders of such bonds, shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce such person's rights against the municipality, and the governing body of the municipality and any officer, agent or employee of the municipality, including, but not limited to, the right to require the municipality and governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the municipality, to assess, levy and collect taxes and other revenues and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such taxes, revenues and charges. The taxes authorized to be pledged in this section shall be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the municipality, and all such taxes to be levied are hereby declared to have been levied for county and corporation purposes, respectively, within the meaning of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 29.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 12; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(46); T.C.A., § 6-2812.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 2.

7-53-307. Certificate for pledge of municipal credit — Regulation by finance committee.

The building finance committee in the industrial development division of the department of economic and community development is hereby authorized and empowered to determine whether any municipality shall have the right to pledge the full faith and credit of the municipality as surety to the payment of principal and interest of bonds as authorized in § 7-53-306. Each municipality within this state shall have the right to apply to the committee for a certificate of public purpose and necessity from the committee as to whether the general welfare requires that such municipality be authorized to execute any such pledge.

In determining whether such certificate shall be issued, the committee may hold public hearings, or private hearings, make investigations as may be desired, and shall have power to summon witnesses, administer oaths, hear testimony and make a record of all things had and done at such hearing or investigation, and to order issued such certificate of public purpose and necessity as the committee may deem advisable.

In considering and determining whether or not such certificate shall issue, the committee shall find and determine affirmatively the following, that:

There are sufficient natural resources readily and economically available for the use and operation of the particular project and enterprise for at least ten (10) years, but in no event less than the period of time for which any bonds may be issued for acquiring or constructing such project;

There is available a labor supply to furnish at least one and one half (1½) workers for each operative job in the enterprise within an area of twenty-five (25) miles from the proposed location; and

There are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions, so that the total pledge of full faith and credit of the municipality, solely for the purpose authorized by this chapter, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the municipality ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of issuance of such bonds.

In no event shall the committee authorize any municipality actually to pledge its full faith and credit to the payment of bonds for any such enterprise, unless the committee shall further find and determine that the enterprise to be carried on in the project is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect for success, will provide proper economic development and employment, and that the project will not become a burden upon the taxpayers of the municipality.

If and when the certificate is issued, the committee therein shall fix and determine in the certificate:

The extent and the amount of the bonds to which the municipality may pledge its full faith and credit;

The purposes for which the bonds shall be expended; and

The method of lease, rental and operation of the project if the project is to be leased to a lessee. If the governing board of the municipality fails or refuses to follow the requirements made by the board in the certificate, then the members of the governing board of the municipality voting for such failure or refusal shall be individually and personally liable, and liable for their official bonds for any loss that the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure or refusal to follow the requirements, and in addition may be compelled by injunction to comply with such requirements.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out this chapter, not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; Acts 1975, ch. 311, § 1; 1976, ch. 515, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-2813.

Cross-References. Organization of building finance committee, §4-14-109.

7-53-308. Corporation nonprofit — Net earnings — Transfer of assets.

The corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors of the corporation shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds, and other obligations of the corporation, then any net earnings of the corporation thereafter accruing shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease, sale contract, loan agreement, mortgage or deed of trust entered into by the corporation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, nothing in this section shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its assets in accordance with the terms of any lease, sale contract, loan agreement, mortgage or deed of trust entered into by the corporation.

This subsection (b) shall apply to any county having a population of over nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 15; 1959, ch. 222, § 5; 1976, ch. 515, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-2814; Acts 2014, ch. 752, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. City’s Use of Payments Received Through Industrial Development Corporation to Fund Workforce Training Programs. OAG 15-43, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 66 (4/30/15).

7-53-309. Bonds as legal investments and lawful security.

Bonds issued under the authority of this chapter and secured by a pledge of full faith and credit shall be and are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees, guardians and for all public funds of the state, including, but not limited to, the sinking funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations, or subdivisions of the state. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the state, and any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state, and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for the deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appertaining to the bonds.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 17; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.25; T.C.A., § 6-2816.

7-53-310. Acquisition and transfer of project sites.

Any municipality may acquire a project site by gift, purchase, lease, or condemnation, and may transfer any project site to a corporation by sale, lease, or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law. Such project site may be within or without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality.

Acts 1959, ch. 222, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-2819.

7-53-311. Lease or lease-purchase agreement with municipality authorized — Tax levy.

Any city, county or metropolitan government is authorized to enter into any lease or lease-purchase agreement of a project from a corporation, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of such city, county or metropolitan government, notwithstanding and without regard to the restrictions, prohibitions or requirements of any other law, whether public or private, and to levy and collect a direct annual tax sufficient with any other moneys available and pledged to pay the rental payable under such lease or lease-purchase agreement as and when it becomes due and payable, such tax to be in addition to all other taxes of such city, county or metropolitan government and shall be in addition to all other taxes now or hereafter authorized to be levied, and such tax shall not be included within any statutory or other limitation in rate or amount, but shall be excluded and be in addition thereto, notwithstanding the prohibitions, restrictions or requirements of any other law, whether public or private, and the obligations assumed and undertaken pursuant to such lease or lease-purchase agreement, including any unconditional or other obligation to levy such tax and to pay rentals for the project for a fixed term or terms, shall not be deemed or construed as constituting a debt of the city, county or metropolitan government within the terms, provisions or limitations of any constitutional, statutory, charter or other limitation.

Acts 1973, ch. 304, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-2821.

7-53-312. Preparation and submission of economic impact plan for counties other than those with a metropolitan government and a population exceeding 500,000.

The corporation is authorized to prepare and submit to the municipality for approval an economic impact plan in the manner described in this section.

An economic impact plan shall be a written document and shall specifically identify the area to be included in the plan. The area to be included in the plan must be located in the municipality and must also include an industrial park within the meaning of § 13-16-102, or a project that is either owned by the corporation or with respect to which the corporation has loaned or will loan funds or has otherwise provided or will provide financial assistance. In addition to such industrial park or project, the area that is the subject of the economic impact plan may also include such other properties that the corporation determines will be directly improved or benefited due to the undertaking of the industrial park or project. The economic impact plan shall:

Identify the boundaries of the area subject to the plan;

Identify the industrial park or project located within the area subject to the plan;

Discuss the expected benefits to the municipality from the development of the area subject to the plan, including anticipated tax receipts and jobs created; and

Provide that the property taxes imposed on the property, including the personal property, located within the area subject to the plan will be distributable in the manner described in subsection (c) for a period of time specified in the plan.

Upon the approval by the municipality of an economic impact plan with respect to an area, all property taxes levied upon property located within such area by any taxing agency after the effective date of the plan shall be divided as follows:

That portion of the taxes that is equal to the amount of taxes, if any, that were payable with respect to the property for the year prior to the date the economic impact plan was approved, the “base tax amount”, by the municipality shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid to the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by such taxing agencies on all other property are paid; provided, that in any year in which the taxes on any property are less than the base tax amount, there shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing agencies only those taxes actually imposed; and

Any excess of taxes over the base tax amount shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid into a separate fund of the corporation established to hold such payments until applied for the purposes described in subsection (h).

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, the corporation may prepare, and the municipality may approve, an economic impact plan that allocates an amount greater than the base tax amount to the taxing agencies.

An economic impact plan shall not provide for an allocation of taxes to the corporation for a period in excess of thirty (30) years.

The governing body of a municipality may approve an economic impact plan by resolution, notwithstanding any local charter provision or other provision to the contrary. If the area subject to an economic impact plan is located within the corporate limits of a city or town, the taxes that would otherwise be payable to the city, town or county that is not the municipality that created the corporation shall not be paid to the corporation unless such city, town or county has also approved the economic impact plan.

Before the corporation submits an economic impact plan for approval to the municipality that created such corporation or to any other city or county, the corporation shall hold a public hearing relating to the proposed plan after publishing a notice of such public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least two (2) weeks prior to the date of such public hearing. Such notice shall include the time, place and purpose of the public hearing, and notice of how a map of the area subject to the plan can be viewed by the public.

All taxes allocated to the corporation pursuant to this section shall only be applied by the corporation to pay expenses of the board in furtherance of promoting economic development in the municipality, to pay the cost of projects, or to pay debt service on bonds or other obligations issued by the corporation to pay the cost of the projects. The corporation is authorized to pledge any or all amounts received by the corporation pursuant to this section to the payment of such bonds or other obligations.

After the approval by a municipality of an economic impact plan, the clerk or other recording official of such municipality shall transmit to the appropriate assessor of property and to each taxing agency to be affected, a copy of the description of all property within the area subject to the economic impact plan and a copy of the resolution approving that plan. If the plan is approved by any taxing agency other than the municipality, the clerk or other recording official of that taxing agency shall also provide a copy of the resolution approving the plan to such assessor of property and taxing agencies. A copy of the plan and any resolutions approving the plan shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury, and an annual statement of amounts allocated in excess of the base tax amount shall be filed with the state board of equalization.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, taxes levied upon property within an economic impact area by any taxing agency for the payment of principal of and interest on all bonds, loans, or other indebtedness of such taxing agency, and taxes levied by or for the benefit of the state, shall not be subject to allocation as provided in subsection (c), but may still be levied against such property and, when collected, paid to such taxing agency as taxes levied by such taxing agency on all other property are paid and collected.

This section shall not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. With respect to a county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), § 7-53-314 shall apply.

In the event of any conflict between this section and the Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012, compiled in title 9, chapter 23, title 9, chapter 23 shall control.

Acts 2004, ch. 662, § 1; 2008, ch. 770, § 1; 2008, ch. 1013, § 4; 2010, ch. 940, § 1; 2012, ch. 605, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-53-312, relating to information concerning debt obligation issuances, was transferred to §9-21-151 [now §9-21-134] in 1990.

Acts 2008, ch. 770, § 3 provided that the act, which added subsection (k), shall apply to all economic impact plans submitted on or July 1, 2008.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2010, ch. 940, § 1 provided that former subsection (l ) shall cease to be effective July 1, 2012.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.